North Carolina, session 2025, SB910.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EXPANDING HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE OF FERTILITY CARE
SECTION 1.1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-241. Fertility and infertility coverage.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Fertility diagnostic care. – Procedures, products, genetic testing, medications,
counseling, including genetic counseling, and services intended to provide
information and counseling about an individual's fertility, including
laboratory assessments and imaging studies.
(2) Fertility treatment. – Procedures, products, genetic testing, medications,
counseling, and services, including in vitro fertilization and assisted
reproduction services, that are intended to establish a pregnancy or treat
infertility and that are provided in a manner consistent with established
medical practice and professional guidelines published by the American
Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor organization, or a
comparable organization, including preconception care, procurement,
cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, or other reproductive
tissue.
(3) Gamete. – Sperm or eggs.
(4) Infertility. – Any of the following:
a. The presence of a condition recognized by a licensed healthcare
provider that impacts an individual's ability to establish a pregnancy
or to carry a pregnancy based on an individual's medical, sexual, and
reproductive history, age, physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any
combination of these factors. This includes infertility arising from
disabilities or from medical treatments or conditions associated with a
disability.
b. An individual's inability to establish a pregnancy because the
individual, or the individual and the individual's partner, do not have
the necessary gametes to establish a pregnancy.
c. The need for medical intervention, including the use of donor gametes
or donor embryos, in order to achieve a successful pregnancy, either
as an individual or with a partner.
d. The inability to establish a pregnancy after regular, unprotected sexual
intercourse for a period of no more than 12 months for an intended
gestational parent under the age of 35 or of no more than six months
for an intended gestational parent who is 35 years of age or older.
Pregnancy loss does not restart the required 12-month or six-month
time period under this sub-subdivision.
e. An individual's increased risk, independently or with the individual's
partner, of transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or chromosomal
abnormality to a child.
f. As defined by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its
successor organization, or a comparable organization.
(5) Reserved for future codification purposes.
Page 2 Senate Bill 910-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Standard fertility preservation services. – Counseling, products, medications,
procedures, genetic testing, and services intended to preserve fertility that are
(i) recommended by a board-certified obstetrician gynecologist, reproductive
endocrinologist, or other qualified healthcare provider or (ii) consistent with
current medical practices and professional guidelines published by the
American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American Society of
Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations for an
individual who has a medical or genetic condition, including conditions
related to a disability or chronic illness, or is expected to receive medical
treatment that has a side effect, or possible side effect, of a risk to that
individual's fertility.
(b) A health benefit plan that provides any pregnancy-related benefit shall provide
coverage for any covered individual diagnosed with infertility that includes fertility diagnostic
care and fertility treatment performed by any licensed healthcare provider acting within the scope
of practice of the provider's license.
(c) All of the following shall be included as part of coverage required under this section:
(1) No fewer than four completed oocyte retrievals.
(2) Unlimited embryo transfers from any completed oocyte retrieval, regardless
of whether the retrieval was one of those required under subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(3) Unlimited cycles of intrauterine insemination.
(4) Unlimited intracervical insemination.
(5) Standard fertility preservation services, including coverage for procurement,
cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, or other reproductive
tissue, when the covered individual has a diagnosed medical or genetic
condition that may, directly or indirectly, including through the necessary
treatment for the disease or condition, cause impairment of fertility by
affecting reproductive organs or processes. Cryopreservation required to be
covered under this subdivision shall be covered, at a minimum, for the later
of the following periods:
a. From the date of cryopreservation until the date any applicable
covered individual reaches the age of 35.
b. For a period of not less than five years.
(d) Coverage under this section shall not include any of the following:
(1) Any exclusion, limitation, or other restriction on coverage of fertility
medications that are different from those imposed on other prescription
medications.
(2) Exclusion or denial of coverage of any fertility treatment based on a covered
individual's participation in fertility services provided by a third party,
including gestational carriers, surrogates, and the donation or use of the third
party's genetic material.
(3) Any deductible, copayment, coinsurance, benefit maximum, or other
limitation on coverage for services rendered in accordance with this section
that are different from those imposed upon services not relating to infertility
or fertility treatment.
(4) Any waiting period for service under this section.
(5) The use of any prior diagnosis, an individual's disability, or prior fertility
treatment as a basis for excluding, limiting, or otherwise restricting the access
to coverage under this section.
(6) Different limitations on coverage for, the provisions of different benefits to,
or different requirements on a class of individuals on account of age, ancestry,
Senate Bill 910-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
color, disability, ethnicity, gender identity, genetic information, marital status,
national origin, race, religion, sex, or sexual orientation.
(e) No health benefit plan is required to provide coverage for any nonmedical costs
relating to the procurement of gametes, donor embryos, or surrogacy services required to be
covered by this section."
SECTION 1.1.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2027, and applies to
insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
SECTION 1.2.(a) G.S. 135-48.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.51. Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:
…
(6a) G.S. 58-3-241, Fertility and infertility coverage.
…."
SECTION 1.2.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2027, and applies as of
the start of the next plan year following that date.

PART II. MEDICAID COVERAGE OF FERTILITY CARE
SECTION 2.1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Health Benefits, shall seek approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS)
to implement Medicaid coverage for care. This coverage shall include fertility diagnostic care,
any medically necessary ovulation-enhancing drugs, and intrauterine insemination that is
intended to treat infertility and achieve a pregnancy that results in a live birth that includes at
least three cycles of ovulation-enhancing medication treatment over a Medicaid beneficiary's
lifetime.
SECTION 2.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of forty-five million dollars
($45,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to be used to implement the new coverage required under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART III. EDUCATION TRAINING MODULE FOR CERTAIN LICENSING BOARDS
SECTION 3.1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-5.5. Certain continuing medical education requirements.
In addition to continuing medical education requirements required by the Board under this
Article, the Board shall make available to licensees an education training module in accordance
with this section. In developing the education training module, the Board shall consult experts in
lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer family building, the American Society for
Reproductive Medicine, and the Society for Assisted Reproductive Technology. The education
training module shall provide training to encourage licensees to speak and have effective
discussions with their patients and families in an appropriate manner on all of the following:
(1) Prevention and elimination of discrimination based on sexual orientation and
expression in medical settings.
(2) Improving access to services for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer
individuals.
(3) Options for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer individuals seeking
to start or grow their family."
SECTION 3.1.(b) G.S. 90-171.42 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-171.42. Continuing education programs.
Page 4 Senate Bill 910-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Upon request, the Board shall grant approval to continuing education programs upon
a finding that the program offers an educational experience designed to enhance the practice of
nursing.
(b) If the program offers to teach nurses to perform advance skills, the Board may grant
approval for the program and the performance of the advanced skills by those successfully
completing the program when it finds that the nature of the procedures taught in the program and
the program facilities and faculty are such that a nurse successfully completing the program can
reasonably be expected to carry out those procedures safely and competently.
(c) In addition to continuing education requirements required by the Board under this
Article, the Board shall make available to licensees an education training module in accordance
with this subsection. In developing the education training module, the Board shall consult experts
in lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer family building, the American Society for
Reproductive Medicine, and the Society for Assisted Reproductive Technology. The education
training module shall provide training to encourage licensees to speak and have effective
discussions with their patients and families in an appropriate manner on all of the following:
(1) Prevention and elimination of discrimination based on sexual orientation and
expression in medical settings.
(2) Improving access to services for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer
individuals.
(3) Options for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer individuals seeking
to start or grow their family."
SECTION 3.1.(c) Certified Nurse Midwife Training. – The joint subcommittee of
the North Carolina Medical Board and the North Carolina Board of Nursing created pursuant to
G.S. 90-18.2 to administer the practice of midwifery under Article 10A of Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes shall adopt permanent rules to make available to licensees an education training
module in accordance with this subsection. In developing the education training module, the
Board shall consult experts in lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer family building, the
American Society for Reproductive Medicine, and the Society for Assisted Reproductive
Technology. The education training module shall provide training to encourage licensees to
speak and have effective discussions with their patients and families in an appropriate manner on
all of the following:
(1) Prevention and elimination of discrimination based on sexual orientation and
expression in medical settings.
(2) Improving access to services for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer
individuals.
(3) Options for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and queer individuals seeking
to start or grow their family.
SECTION 3.2. The North Carolina Medical Board and the North Carolina Board of
Nursing shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of Section 3.1 of this Part.
SECTION 3.3. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2026.

PART IV. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES FERTILITY CARE
INITIATIVES

FERTILITY CARE RESOURCE HUB
SECTION 4.1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund statewide operation and maintenance of a
fertility care resource hub accessible in person, through the World Wide Web, or through any
other means of electronic access, to refer individuals seeking information regarding fertility care
and treatment. In establishing and operating the hub funded by this section, the Department of
Senate Bill 910-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Health and Human Services shall partner with healthcare providers, local health departments,
community health centers, and other interested stakeholders to ensure that at least all of the
following information is available through the fertility care resource hub:
(1) Medically accurate, evidence-based information about fertility care options
based on practice guidance by the American Society for Reproductive
Medicine.
(2) Guidance on connecting or receiving referrals to appropriate fertility clinics
that are members in good standing of the Society for Assisted Reproductive
Technology, or another nationally recognized organization of professionals
dedicated to the practice of assisted reproductive technologies.
(3) Support for navigating health insurance coverage.
(4) Sources of financial assistance for fertility-related services.
SECTION 4.1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

STUDY ON FAMILY PLANNING RESOURCES, BENEFITS, AND SERVICES FOR
INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING DISPARITIES IN ACCESSING FERTILITY CARE
SECTION 4.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support, Office of Health
Equity (the Office), the sum of seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to conduct a study on the affordability, accessibility, and practicality of
the resources, benefits, and services available to individuals in underrepresented groups
experiencing disparities in accessing fertility care when seeking to expand their families,
including individuals who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, gender nonconforming,
queer, or question their sexual orientation or gender identity and expression. In conducting this
study, the Office shall do all of the following:
(1) Examine the availability of assisted reproduction providers in rural and
geographically isolated areas of the State.
(2) Assess the amount of funding and any program changes that would be
necessary to enhance family planning resources, benefits, and services for the
growing population of individuals in underrepresented groups experiencing
disparities in accessing fertility care as they seek to expand their families.
(3) Examine the feasibility of developing statewide training curricula to improve
provider competency in the delivery of health and social support services to
parents in underrepresented groups experiencing disparities in accessing
fertility care as they seek to expand their families.
(4) Examine the extent to which out-of-pocket costs associated with becoming a
parent are impacted by sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other factor
or characteristic associated with experiencing disparity in accessing fertility
care.
(5) Recommend best practices for increasing access to available resources,
benefits, and services and eliminating disparities in this area for individuals in
underrepresented groups experiencing disparities in accessing fertility care as
they seek to expand their families.
(6) Make recommendations to improve the resources, benefits, and services
available to individuals in underrepresented groups experiencing disparities in
accessing fertility care, with respect to parentage, including, but not limited
to, adoption, surrogacy, and assistive reproductive technology.
(7) Make recommendations regarding education and training for health care
providers and providers of family planning services to improve cultural
competency and increase referrals to relevant resources.
Page 6 Senate Bill 910-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.2.(b) At the conclusion of the study, the Office shall develop
recommendations for improving access to resources, benefits, and services for individuals in
underrepresented groups experiencing disparities in accessing fertility care as they seek to
expand their families. In formulating these recommendations, the Office shall take into account
the best policies and practices of other states and jurisdictions. Additionally, the Office may
consult with experts, hold regular public meetings and fact-finding hearings, and host other
public forums as the Office considers necessary in fulfilling this charge.
SECTION 4.2.(c) The Office may contract with a third party to conduct the study
authorized by this section as long as the third party has a demonstrated capacity to (i) conduct
research that meets academic peer-review standards, specifically in the analysis of both
quantitative and qualitative data, and (ii) disseminate study findings in a clear and accessible
format.
SECTION 4.2.(d) The Office may enter into a memorandum of understanding with
other State agencies, academic institutions, or research centers located in the State that are in
possession of or have access to the data necessary to complete this study, including the North
Carolina State Center for Health Statistics, the Carolina Center for Health Informatics, and the
Sheps Center for Health Services Research at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.
SECTION 4.2.(e) The Office shall submit its findings and recommendations,
including any recommended legislative changes, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by April 1, 2028.
SECTION 4.2.(f) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART V. PROTECTION OF THE RIGHT TO ACCESS ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE
TECHNOLOGY AND CONTRACEPTIVES
SECTION 5.1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 1Q.
"Assisted Reproductive Technology and Contraceptive Rights.
"§ 90-21.195. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) Assisted reproductive technology. – All treatments or procedures that include
the handling of human oocytes or human embryos, including in vitro
fertilization, gamete intrafallopian transfer, and zygote intrafallopian transfer.
(2) Contraception. – An action taken to prevent pregnancy, including the use of
contraceptives, emergency contraceptives, and sterilization procedures.
(3) Contraceptive. – Any device, medication, biological product, or procedure
that is intended for use in the prevention of pregnancy, whether specifically
intended to prevent pregnancy or for other health needs, and that is legally
marketed under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301,
et seq.).
(4) Health care provider. – Either of the following:
a. An individual who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under
this Chapter to provide health care services in the ordinary course of
business or practice of a profession or in an approved education or
training program.
b. A health care facility licensed under Chapter 131E of the General
Statutes to provide health care services to patients.
The term "health care provider" includes (i) an agent or employee of a
health care facility that is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to
provide health care services, (ii) the officers and directors of a health care
Senate Bill 910-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
facility, and (iii) an agent or employee of a health care provider who is
licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to provide health care services.
(5) Health care service. – A health or medical procedure or service rendered by a
health care provider that meets either of the following criteria:
a. Provides testing, diagnosis, or treatment of a health condition, illness,
injury, or disease.
b. Dispenses drugs, medical devices, medical appliances, or medical
goods for the treatment of a health condition, illness, injury, or disease.
"§ 90-21.196. Right to access assisted reproductive technology and contraceptives.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to clearly and unambiguously acknowledge the right
of an individual to perform, and the right of an individual to receive or use, assisted reproductive
technology, contraceptives, or both in this State. To that end, and notwithstanding any other
provision of law, an individual has a right to engage in activities associated with assisted
reproductive technology and contraception. The laws of this State do not prohibit an activity
associated with assisted reproductive technology or contraception.
"§ 90-21.197. Construction.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prohibit the enforcement of health and safety
laws related to the operation of health care facilities or the provision of health care services by
health care providers."

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 8 Senate Bill 910-First Edition